District of Columbia statutes.
34-2155

Rules and procedures.

The Mayor, in consultation with WASA, is authorized to promulgate rules and to establish procedures to implement this chapter.

History

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 6016, 51 DCR 8441

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6016 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6016 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).